Washington statutes.
RCW 14.08.310

Assistance to other municipalities.

Whenever the governing body of any municipality determines that the public interest and the interests of the municipality will be served by assisting any other municipality in exercising the powers and authority granted by this chapter, such first-mentioned municipality is expressly authorized and empowered to furnish such assistance by gift, or lease with or without rental, of real property, by the donation, lease with or without rental, or loan, of personal property, and by the appropriation of moneys, which may be provided for by taxation or the issuance of bonds in the same manner as funds might be provided for the same purposes if the municipality were exercising the powers heretofore granted in its own behalf.

[ 1945 c 182 s 14; Rem. Supp. 1945 s 2722-43.]